Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.505

Judicial stabilization trust account.

The judicial stabilization trust account is created within the state treasury, subject to appropriation. All receipts from the surcharges authorized by RCW 3.62.060(2), 12.40.020, 36.18.018(4), and 36.18.020(5) shall be deposited in this account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

Expenditures from the account may be used only for the support of judicial branch agencies and, for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, for expenditures to address state and local costs related to the State v. Blake decision.

[ 2022 c 297 s 956; 2019 c 251 s 9; 2011 1st sp.s. c 44 s 6; 2009 c 572 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 297: See note following RCW 43.79.565.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 3.62.020.

Effective date—2009 c 572: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 572 s 6.]